Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,123
Health maintenance organization; exercise of powers; approval requirements.

A health maintenance organization shall file notice, with adequate supporting information, with the director prior to the exercise of any power granted in subdivision (1), (2), or (4) of section 44-32,122 which may affect the financial soundness of the health maintenance organization. The director shall disapprove such exercise of power only if it would substantially and adversely affect the financial soundness of the health maintenance organization and endanger its ability to meet its obligations. If the director does not disapprove the exercise of the power within thirty days of the filing, it shall be deemed approved. The director may exempt activities having a de minimis effect from the filing requirement.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 32.